California, session 20252026, AB716.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13105.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:13105.4.(a)The State Fire Marshal shall adopt the National Fire Protection Association Hydrogen Technologies Code (NFPA 2) as the statewide fire safety standards and guidelines for hydrogen production, storage, and distribution facilities.(b)A local government, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, may adopt fire safety standards more stringent than the statewide fire safety standards adopted by the State Fire Marshal, based on unique local hazards and risks.(c)13105.4. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall appoint a hydrogen fire expert to answer questions and provide clarification on the implementation of NFPA 2, hydrogen production, storage, and distribution facilities, ensuring that hydrogen facilities comply with the most up-to-date fire safety standards.(d)(b) The State Fire Marshal shall provide ongoing training to local fire departments and building inspectors to ensure that hydrogen-related safety protocols are understood and enforced statewide.